Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF977.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin TRANSFER; VOTING OPERATIONS, TECHNOLOGY, AND ELECTION RESOURCES ACCOUNT.new text end new text begin $2,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are transferred from the general fund to the voting operations, technology, and election resources account established under Minnesota Statutes, section 5.305. new text end